engine/dictionaries/si_LK/si_LK.aff
SET UTF-8

TRY ්ාෘුැූෑිීෙ

REP 25
REP න ණ
REP ණ න
REP ල ළ
REP ළ ල
REP ස ෂ
REP ෂ ස
REP ස ශ
REP ශ ස
REP ච ඡ
REP ඡ ච
REP බ භ
REP භ බ
REP ද ධ
REP ධ ද
REP ර් ්‍ර
REP ට ඨ
REP ඨ ට
REP ක ඛ
REP ඛ ක
REP ඩ ඪ
REP ඪ ඩ
REP ඉ ඊ
REP ඊ ඉ
REP ප ඵ
REP ඵ ප

FLAG num
SFX 3128 Y 1
SFX 3128 0 ර්ථයක් .
SFX 1969 Y 1
SFX 1969 0 වලම .
SFX 1170 Y 1
SFX 1170 0 වලය .
SFX 3241 Y 1
SFX 3241 0 පිටි .
SFX 220 Y 1
SFX 220 0 වල් .
SFX 1169 Y 1
SFX 1169 0 වලා .
SFX 3058 Y 1
SFX 3058 0 වලි .
SFX 1462 Y 1
SFX 1462 0 වලු .
SFX 2033 Y 1
SFX 2033 0 පූර්ණ .
SFX 4703 Y 1
SFX 4703 0 න්ඩ් .
SFX 4704 Y 1
SFX 4704 0 න්ඩෝ .
SFX 3855 Y 1
SFX 3855 0 ිතුරු .
SFX 3619 Y 1
SFX 3619 0 ෙනෙක් .
SFX 999 Y 1
SFX 999 0 නෙත් .
SFX 662 Y 1
SFX 662 0 යටයි .
SFX 2078 Y 1
SFX 2078 0 ත්වයක .
SFX 206 Y 1
SFX 206 0 ත්වයට .
SFX 1519 Y 1
SFX 1519 0 ත්වයද .
SFX 4287 Y 1
SFX 4287 0 වසක් .
SFX 1957 Y 1
SFX 1957 0 විල් .
SFX 3000 Y 1
SFX 3000 0 සටහනක් .
SFX 2360 Y 1
SFX 2360 0 විලි .
SFX 331 Y 1
SFX 331 0 ත්වයේ .
SFX 747 Y 1
SFX 747 0 නන් .
SFX 4054 Y 1
SFX 4054 0 ාංශයක් .
SFX 2660 Y 1
SFX 2660 0 ්‍යාත්මක .
SFX 3007 Y 1
SFX 3007 0 ෂණ .
SFX 4356 Y 1
SFX 4356 0 ල්ලන්ගේ .
SFX 4190 Y 1
SFX 4190 0 ෂය .
SFX 2777 Y 1
SFX 2777 0 ීයත්වය .
SFX 1444 Y 1
SFX 1444 0 ෂ් .
SFX 970 Y 1
SFX 970 0 ෂා .
SFX 1229 Y 1
SFX 1229 0 ්නෙමි .
SFX 4189 Y 1
SFX 4189 0 ෂි .
SFX 1378 Y 1
SFX 1378 0 ්නෙමු .
SFX 3297 Y 1
SFX 3297 0 නාට .
SFX 2522 Y 1
SFX 2522 0 නාද .
SFX 2521 Y 1
SFX 2521 0 නාම .
SFX 4424 Y 1
SFX 4424 0 රීන් .
SFX 935 Y 1
SFX 935 0 ්නම් .
SFX 3322 Y 1
SFX 3322 0 දුවෙන් .
SFX 1339 Y 1
SFX 1339 0 නාව .
SFX 1741 Y 1
SFX 1741 0 නාහ .
SFX 1638 Y 1
SFX 1638 0 ාවක්ද .
SFX 3410 Y 1
SFX 3410 0 ක්‍රියා .
SFX 3061 Y 1
SFX 3061 0 වර්ග .
SFX 3060 Y 1
SFX 3060 0 වර්ණ .
SFX 4265 Y 1
SFX 4265 0 වාසීන්ගේ .
SFX 412 Y 1
SFX 412 0 සිංහ .
SFX 3187 Y 1
SFX 3187 0 යකත් .
SFX 1283 Y 1
SFX 1283 0 ාධාර .
SFX 165 Y 1
SFX 165 0 ලින් .
SFX 4985 Y 1
SFX 4985 0 ගඟේ .
SFX 3161 Y 1
SFX 3161 0 රණයට .
SFX 260 Y 1
SFX 260 0 ගොඩ .
SFX 3977 Y 1
SFX 3977 0 ාර්ථයන් .
SFX 1057 Y 1
SFX 1057 0 වේත් .
SFX 3160 Y 1
SFX 3160 0 රණයේ .
SFX 805 Y 1
SFX 805 0 කුගේ .
SFX 3425 Y 1
SFX 3425 0 කාවෙන් .
SFX 3339 Y 1
SFX 3339 0 දයට .
SFX 2862 Y 1
SFX 2862 0 ිකත්වයට .
SFX 3548 Y 1
SFX 3548 0 ්ටින් .
SFX 2029 Y 1
SFX 2029 0 භාවයක් .
SFX 3338 Y 1
SFX 3338 0 දයි .
SFX 1323 Y 1
SFX 1323 0 යවත් .
SFX 4015 Y 1
SFX 4015 0 ාධිපතිවරයා .
SFX 3251 Y 1
SFX 3251 0 පතිවරයකු .
SFX 3421 Y 1
SFX 3421 0 කියි .
SFX 3377 Y 1
SFX 3377 0 ටීම .
SFX 4414 Y 1
SFX 4414 0 රුවට .
SFX 2328 Y 1
SFX 2328 0 ස්ථානයකට .
SFX 3559 Y 1
SFX 3559 0 ්කරුගේ .
SFX 1186 Y 1
SFX 1186 0 යානු .
SFX 854 Y 1
SFX 854 0 න්නක් .
SFX 705 Y 1
SFX 705 0 යකටත් .
SFX 1335 Y 1
SFX 1335 0 න්නකි .
SFX 4693 Y 1
SFX 4693 0 න්නකු .
SFX 1997 Y 1
SFX 1997 0 රුවා .
SFX 1162 Y 1
SFX 1162 0 ස්ථානයක් .
SFX 2970 Y 1
SFX 2970 0 ස්ථානයකි .
SFX 2418 Y 1
SFX 2418 0 රුවේ .
SFX 4293 Y 1
SFX 4293 0 වලින්ද .
SFX 4292 Y 1
SFX 4292 0 වලින්ම .
SFX 3129 Y 1
SFX 3129 0 ර්ගේ .
SFX 273 Y 1
SFX 273 0 යනට .
SFX 905 Y 1
SFX 905 0 යේදීත් .
SFX 2288 Y 1
SFX 2288 0 ාවලියක් .
SFX 3499 Y 1
SFX 3499 0 ්‍යයෙහි .
SFX 27 Y 1
SFX 27 0 යන් .
SFX 4510 Y 1
SFX 4510 0 යනි .
SFX 3184 Y 1
SFX 3184 0 යනේ .
SFX 2394 Y 1
SFX 2394 0 වන්නේය .
SFX 2123 Y 1
SFX 2123 0 කෝන් .
SFX 3681 Y 1
SFX 3681 0 ුරන් .
SFX 4579 Y 1
SFX 4579 0 මන්ඩ් .
SFX 3248 Y 1
SFX 3248 0 පත්වලට .
SFX 3906 Y 1
SFX 3906 0 ැස්මට .
SFX 695 Y 1
SFX 695 0 වැනි .
SFX 1024 Y 1
SFX 1024 0 ෙකින් .
SFX 152 Y 1
SFX 152 0 යාට .
SFX 604 Y 1
SFX 604 0 වලත් .
SFX 1321 Y 1
SFX 1321 0 යාද .
SFX 416 Y 1
SFX 416 0 යාම .
SFX 1085 Y 1
SFX 1085 0 යාය .
SFX 4848 Y 1
SFX 4848 0 තිකයන් .
SFX 4484 Y 1
SFX 4484 0 යාල .
SFX 2679 Y 1
SFX 2679 0 ්ථක .
SFX 404 Y 1
SFX 404 0 යාව .
SFX 2874 Y 1
SFX 2874 0 ැන්තිය .
SFX 3151 Y 1
SFX 3151 0 රවීම .
SFX 3124 Y 1
SFX 3124 0 ලයකින් .
SFX 185 Y 1
SFX 185 0 යාගේ .
SFX 1890 Y 1
SFX 1890 0 ිඳු .
SFX 3004 Y 1
SFX 3004 0 ෂාන් .
SFX 3877 Y 1
SFX 3877 0 ිගන්වනු .
SFX 4124 Y 1
SFX 4124 0 ස්ගේ .
SFX 2326 Y 1
SFX 2326 0 ස්ථානවල .
SFX 3575 Y 1
SFX 3575 0 ොවක් .
SFX 3216 Y 1
SFX 3216 0 මයක .
SFX 1714 Y 1
SFX 1714 0 මයට .
SFX 4434 Y 1
SFX 4434 0 රවල .
SFX 3655 Y 1
SFX 3655 0 ුවෙන්ම .
SFX 4961 Y 1
SFX 4961 0 ගල්වලින් .
SFX 1506 Y 1
SFX 1506 0 නවත් .
SFX 1108 Y 1
SFX 1108 0 ණොත් .
SFX 3213 Y 1
SFX 3213 0 මයා .
SFX 4747 Y 1
SFX 4747 0 නගන .
SFX 131 Y 1
SFX 131 0 මයි .
SFX 4576 Y 1
SFX 4576 0 මයේ .
SFX 1584 Y 1
SFX 1584 0 ේවායි .
SFX 2054 Y 1
SFX 2054 0 නියන් .
SFX 3417 Y 1
SFX 3417 0 කුරු .
SFX 4746 Y 1
SFX 4746 0 නගෙ .
SFX 1001 Y 1
SFX 1001 0 නගේ .
SFX 4719 Y 1
SFX 4719 0 නෙක .
SFX 3281 Y 1
SFX 3281 0 නෙම .
SFX 727 Y 1
SFX 727 0 ිකාව .
SFX 902 Y 1
SFX 902 0 ලයක් .
SFX 2764 Y 1
SFX 2764 0 ුණේය .
SFX 3064 Y 1
SFX 3064 0 වරියන් .
SFX 3716 Y 1
SFX 3716 0 ුණේ් .
SFX 2718 Y 1
SFX 2718 0 ෙද්දි .
SFX 476 Y 1
SFX 476 0 ෙද්දී .
SFX 2178 Y 1
SFX 2178 0 ේන්ද්‍ර .
SFX 2379 Y 1
SFX 2379 0 වරුද .
SFX 2900 Y 1
SFX 2900 0 ාර්ථයෙන් .
SFX 4455 Y 1
SFX 4455 0 රටත් .
SFX 2230 Y 1
SFX 2230 0 ිවනු .
SFX 1689 Y 1
SFX 1689 0 ලම් .
SFX 2345 Y 1
SFX 2345 0 සකින් .
SFX 4367 Y 1
SFX 4367 0 ලොවට .
SFX 4395 Y 1
SFX 4395 0 ලමු .
SFX 3586 Y 1
SFX 3586 0 ේශ් .
SFX 4214 Y 1
SFX 4214 0 වූවන්ට .
SFX 1454 Y 1
SFX 1454 0 වීමක .
SFX 2619 Y 1
SFX 2619 0 කිරිම .
SFX 86 Y 1
SFX 86 0 වීමට .
SFX 973 Y 1
SFX 973 0 වීමද .
SFX 4226 Y 1
SFX 4226 0 වීමය .
SFX 4369 Y 1
SFX 4369 0 ලෙයි .
SFX 4911 Y 1
SFX 4911 0 ටමත් .
SFX 368 Y 1
SFX 368 0 වීම් .
SFX 3030 Y 1
SFX 3030 0 වීමි .
SFX 3029 Y 1
SFX 3029 0 වීමු .
SFX 144 Y 1
SFX 144 0 වීමේ .
SFX 3894 Y 1
SFX 3894 0 ිකමක් .
SFX 1355 Y 1
SFX 1355 0 ණත් .
SFX 345 Y 1
SFX 345 0 වරුන්ට .
SFX 3063 Y 1
SFX 3063 0 වරුන්ද .
SFX 4230 Y 1
SFX 4230 0 වීමකදී .
SFX 312 Y 1
SFX 312 0 තුමා .
SFX 3369 Y 1
SFX 3369 0 ණින් .
SFX 676 Y 1
SFX 676 0 ්නන්ට .
SFX 4276 Y 1
SFX 4276 0 වාගෙන් .
SFX 2639 Y 1
SFX 2639 0 කයින්ගෙන් .
SFX 458 Y 1
SFX 458 0 දීමට .
SFX 1948 Y 1
SFX 1948 0 වෙතැයි .
SFX 2671 Y 1
SFX 2671 0 ්නැති .
SFX 1513 Y 1
SFX 1513 0 දීම් .
SFX 750 Y 1
SFX 750 0 දීමේ .
SFX 1916 Y 1
SFX 1916 0 ාන්ත .
SFX 3228 Y 1
SFX 3228 0 බණ්ඩාර .
SFX 3427 Y 1
SFX 3427 0 කාලය .
SFX 4135 Y 1
SFX 4135 0 සුවේ .
SFX 4148 Y 1
SFX 4148 0 සිවලට .
SFX 2447 Y 1
SFX 2447 0 යගෙ .
SFX 742 Y 1
SFX 742 0 යගේ .
SFX 4735 Y 1
SFX 4735 0 නාවකට .
SFX 3446 Y 1
SFX 3446 0 කයෙකුට .
SFX 1039 Y 1
SFX 1039 0 ියයි .
SFX 2056 Y 1
SFX 2056 0 නාවක් .
SFX 3291 Y 1
SFX 3291 0 නාවකි .
SFX 72 Y 1
SFX 72 0 මෙන් .
SFX 2935 Y 1
SFX 2935 0 ාගැන්මට .
SFX 540 Y 1
SFX 540 0 මෙනි .
SFX 485 Y 1
SFX 485 0 වීමයි .
SFX 3101 Y 1
SFX 3101 0 ල්වලට .
SFX 3618 Y 1
SFX 3618 0 ෙන්නක් .
SFX 2185 Y 1
SFX 2185 0 ෙන්නකි .
SFX 3003 Y 1
SFX 3003 0 සකට .
SFX 4044 Y 1
SFX 4044 0 ාගැන්මේ .
SFX 1782 Y 1
SFX 1782 0 කැට .
SFX 548 Y 1
SFX 548 0 කැර .
SFX 3701 Y 1
SFX 3701 0 ුමකදී .
SFX 3612 Y 1
SFX 3612 0 ෙයිද .
SFX 781 Y 1
SFX 781 0 සක් .
SFX 2398 Y 1
SFX 2398 0 වතුන් .
SFX 3002 Y 1
SFX 3002 0 සකි .
SFX 2247 Y 1
SFX 2247 0 ියකදී .
SFX 948 Y 1
SFX 948 0 ිල් .
SFX 377 Y 1
SFX 377 0 ිලා .
SFX 1281 Y 1
SFX 1281 0 ාන්තය .
SFX 2920 Y 1
SFX 2920 0 ාන්තර .
SFX 883 Y 1
SFX 883 0 ිලි .
SFX 1708 Y 1
SFX 1708 0 යන්ගේත් .
SFX 4899 Y 1
SFX 4899 0 ඩුව .
SFX 937 Y 1
SFX 937 0 ්කරුවන් .
SFX 4674 Y 1
SFX 4674 0 පතක .
SFX 655 Y 1
SFX 655 0 ුන්ගේ .
SFX 2500 Y 1
SFX 2500 0 පතට .
SFX 1680 Y 1
SFX 1680 0 වකටම .
SFX 2472 Y 1
SFX 2472 0 මං .
SFX 245 Y 1
SFX 245 0 පත් .
SFX 1727 Y 1
SFX 1727 0 පතා .
SFX 506 Y 1
SFX 506 0 පති .
SFX 1190 Y 1
SFX 1190 0 පතේ .
SFX 2307 Y 1
SFX 2307 0 ාචාර .
SFX 586 Y 1
SFX 586 0 මක .
SFX 4591 Y 1
SFX 4591 0 මග .
SFX 2471 Y 1
SFX 2471 0 මඟ .
SFX 4157 Y 1
SFX 4157 0 සිණි .
SFX 50 Y 1
SFX 50 0 මට .
SFX 1329 Y 1
SFX 1329 0 මත .
SFX 381 Y 1
SFX 381 0 මද .
SFX 4584 Y 1
SFX 4584 0 මන .
SFX 1487 Y 1
SFX 1487 0 මම .
SFX 108 Y 1
SFX 108 0 මය .
SFX 2465 Y 1
SFX 2465 0 මල .
SFX 2596 Y 1
SFX 2596 0 ජාතික .
SFX 1266 Y 1
SFX 1266 0 ියෙක් .
SFX 3484 Y 1
SFX 3484 0 ්වමින් .
SFX 1884 Y 1
SFX 1884 0 ියෙකි .
SFX 2464 Y 1
SFX 2464 0 මව .
SFX 4263 Y 1
SFX 4263 0 වැට .
SFX 1143 Y 1
SFX 1143 0 ියෙකු .
SFX 4572 Y 1
SFX 4572 0 මස .
SFX 4261 Y 1
SFX 4261 0 වැඩ .
SFX 2855 Y 1
SFX 2855 0 ිකරණ .
SFX 4570 Y 1
SFX 4570 0 මහ .
SFX 2854 Y 1
SFX 2854 0 ිකරන .
