engine/dictionaries/si_LK/si_LK.dic
අක්/657,1712,3143,3203,3226,4189,4190,4562
අභිමත/3,14,779,1049,3977
අවි/3,5,14,19,23,26,29,44,55,113,125,157,330,1222,1300,1747,1772,2075,2532,3310,3383,4097,4098,4190,4975
උච්ච/7,115,286,508,1650,2078
කුර/2,20,24,120,208,214,677,728,1609,1845,1850,2747,2798,2923,3102,3530,3674,3714,4036,4102,4356
කුරු/862,997,1331,1940,2025,4530,4985
ත්‍රී/1957
දීම/1,2,3,4,5,6,8,11,13,21,25,28,30,32,36,91,100,163,175,199,234,372,1339,2055,2056,2522,4735
දේශ/3,6,14,15,17,19,23,26,27,31,33,40,44,48,52,55,56,69,93,112,129,175,197,210,225,266,335,382,417,455,456,467,525,571,697,728,928,1159,1198,1199,1200,1221,1339,1341,1342,1775,2055,2056,2490,2519,2777,2778,2920,3289,3447,3734,4635,4947,4948
නදී/333,970
නවද/2964,3619
නියමුවා/747
පරා/11,45,57,58,112,276,452,1209,2613,3338,4298,4299,4989
පරිසරවේ/3339,4808
පරීක්ෂණ/3,14,15,19,23,26,27,29,31,40,44,48,64,68,124,171,240,537,600,662,887,3598
පාන්/3241,3355,4844,4848
පිහිටු/194,198,223,533,694,843,973,1062,1169,2356,2371
පුන/6,20,394,1181,3498,4424
පෙන්වන/520,1092,1229
පෞරුෂ/3,14,19,23,27,34,40,48,75,206,331,751
ප්‍ර/20,21,41,52,136,176,211,235,323,381,438,601,748,785,993,1039,1383,1775,1819,1941,2118,2533,2944,3061,3108,3202,3209,3328,3414,3430,4038,4040,4555,4765,4915,4977,4979
ප්‍රදේශ/6,11,14,15,19,23,26,27,29,31,40,44,48,56,64,68,71,74,128,129,171,210,228,232,237,255,360,379,444,465,467,504,638,662,697,704,735,1166,1167,1710,1969,2369,3187,3449,4264,4265,4292
බාධාව/4,9,25,28,33,84,165
බින්/11,33,211,2069,3322,3398
බෞද්ධ/27,49,64,78,90,93,104,119,185,273,380,415,470,538,906,1158,1426,1645,2290,4265,4478,4508
භාව/14,15,19,23,27,40,44,48,55,71,74,121,175,266,1339,2033,2055,2519,3289,3291
මාළිගා/10,19,38,39,45,127,451,1170,2082
මැන/43,52,53,59,80,107,221,332,377,414,1378,1457,1903,1961,3512,4254
මොර/2,98,260,568,836,842,882,1421,2101,4251
යාන/3,6,14,15,19,20,23,24,40,48,161,272,379,831,955,956,1638,2165
යාය/1,2,4,5,7,17,28,36,200,220,1610
රක්ත/1504,2038,3060,4034
රයේ/1444
රූප/3,11,14,15,16,17,19,20,23,29,33,54,56,74,94,112,349,412,519,860,3000,4182
ලිපින/232,3187
ලිය/4,8,9,13,17,20,24,33,37,57,62,79,82,83,88,109,136,155,159,177,194,211,221,241,244,271,317,351,399,424,482,562,610,652,654,666,670,692,700,707,721,853,986,998,1001,1028,1062,1196,1251,1388,1500,1595,1856,1960,2272,2273,2274,2360,2536,2752,2753,2869,3126,3915,3931,4022,4024,4234,4583
වික්‍රම/3,6,27,93,210,359,412,455,490,519,729,1523,1915,2030,2341,2909,4668
විද/19,20,24,41,57,136,238,314,341,394,578,662,1231,1383,1532,1601,1936,2318,2660,2968,3498,3582,3604,4006
විදින/1462
විද්‍යා/10,15,38,39,45,359,744,782,904,1057,1113,1209,1210,1532,1533,1995,2103,2104,2561,2595,3185,3395,4405,4517,4727,4916,4917,4918
විනෝද/6,8,14,19,23,55,86,308,783,863,1785,1926,2309,4054
විස/2,6,8,16,18,20,24,59,80,83,120,148,169,227,242,278,280,367,420,458,469,596,611,622,687,749,750,766,827,948,1025,1111,1141,1146,1151,1223,1263,1270,1401,1618,1845,1874,2174,2261,2468,2476,2622,2643,2645,2665,2685,2843,2852,2853,2854,3417,3542,3774,3797,3842,3855,3933,4676,4679,4680,4777,4778
වෙත/1,3,5,6,7,9,11,13,16,18,34,92,100,116,139,148,163,182,234,265,531,871,935,1138,1411,1807,4909
වෙළෙඳ/9,967,2521,2987,4094,4554
ශිෂ්‍ය/9,27,49,64,75,78,90,93,104,119,124,154,161,185,189,201,206,236,272,273,310,380,450,508,536,581,690,992,1283,1415,1708,1909,3963,3966,4521
සත්/431,1489,2462,2575,2576,3410
සන්/85,456,811,1741,2064,3286,3310,4898
සමහර/4,28,153,215,216,247,257,297,477,655,799,805,945,1134,1557,1608
සමා/10,39,45,58,425,487,499,861,1203,1517,1751,1772,1941,1959,1995,2074,2532,3128,3156,3310,4208,4801,4802,4812
සහන/3,14,19,23,27,29,56,470,658,891,917,1202,1283
සාං/1544,3382,3425
සාමාජික/27,49,55,64,75,78,90,93,104,119,124,152,154,185,189,201,206,213,236,273,331,339,369,380,415,450,466,538,581,704,1519,1708,2893,4503
සාය/16,25,409,743,4704
සිව්/899,1053,1101,1201,1511,2067,2555,3039,4287,4572,4995
ස්වභාව/14,15,19,23,27,44,48,55,56,64,71,74,147,240,330,688,1046,2270,2857,2862,3336,3882
හවු/4107,4703
හිස/1,2,4,5,6,8,17,18,21,25,30,36,62,110,242,393,445,1329,1372,1563,2125,3438,3539,3548
